apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
    <pardef n="рата/й__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ят</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ю</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ите</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="уле/й__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ct"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ят</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ите</l>
          <r>й<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="бранти/я__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ята</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ята</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ите</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="дядо__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>то</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>то</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вци</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вците</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="кос/ъм__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъма</l>
          <r>ъм<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ct"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъм</l>
          <r>ъм<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъма</l>
          <r>ъм<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъмът</l>
          <r>ъм<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ми</l>
          <r>ъм<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мите</l>
          <r>ъм<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="леки__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="мърт/вец__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вец</l>
          <r>вец<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>веца</l>
          <r>вец<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вецът</l>
          <r>вец<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вецо</l>
          <r>вец<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъвци</l>
          <r>вец<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъвците</l>
          <r>вец<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ища/х__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ха</l>
          <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ct"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>х</l>
          <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ха</l>
          <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хът</l>
          <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>си</l>
          <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сите</l>
          <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="зет__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ят</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ко</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьове</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьовете</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="мърморко"><i>мърморко</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="присмехулко"><i>присмехулко</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="търбух"><i>търбу</i><par n="ища/х__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="зет"><i>зет</i><par n="зет__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="лигльо"><i>лигльо</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="юбилей"><i>юбиле</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="бордей"><i>борде</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="запалянко"><i>запалянко</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="престой"><i>престо</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="гуляй"><i>гуля</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="подлизурко"><i>подлизурко</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="алманах"><i>алмана</i><par n="ища/х__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="колай"><i>кола</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="апогей"><i>апоге</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="търтей"><i>търте</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="плачльо"><i>плачльо</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ритъм"><i>рит</i><par n="кос/ъм__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="безброй"><i>безбро</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="отбой"><i>отбо</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="сипей"><i>сипе</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="монах"><i>мона</i><par n="ища/х__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="леки"><i>леки</i><par n="леки__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ищах"><i>ища</i><par n="ища/х__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="негодяй"><i>негодя</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="стомах"><i>стома</i><par n="ища/х__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="кресльо"><i>кресльо</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="критерий"><i>критери</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="конвой"><i>конво</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="монарх"><i>монар</i><par n="ища/х__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="брантия"><i>бранти</i><par n="бранти/я__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="бърборко"><i>бърборко</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="десни"><i>десни</i><par n="леки__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="замах"><i>зама</i><par n="ища/х__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="прадядо"><i>прадядо</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ручей"><i>руче</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="копой"><i>копо</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="гений"><i>гени</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="трофей"><i>трофе</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="дядо"><i>дядо</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="дрипльо"><i>дрипльо</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="нехранимайко"><i>нехранимайко</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="улей"><i>уле</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="цирей"><i>цире</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="косъм"><i>кос</i><par n="кос/ъм__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="сиромах"><i>сирома</i><par n="ища/х__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="пролетарий"><i>пролетари</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="жребий"><i>жреби</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="фарисей"><i>фарисе</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="злодей"><i>злоде</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="полицай"><i>полица</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="музей"><i>музе</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="герой"><i>геро</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="вариклечко"><i>вариклечко</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="викарий"><i>викари</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="пердах"><i>перда</i><par n="ища/х__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="поплювко"><i>поплювко</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="лицей"><i>лице</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="бързей"><i>бързе</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ауспух"><i>ауспу</i><par n="ища/х__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="глезльо"><i>глезльо</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="лакей"><i>лаке</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="парий"><i>пари</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="морави"><i>морави</i><par n="леки__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="мухльо"><i>мухльо</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="хапльо"><i>хапльо</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="шурей"><i>шуре</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="стадий"><i>стади</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="глашатай"><i>глашата</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="архиерей"><i>архиере</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="часовой"><i>часово</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="кожух"><i>кожу</i><par n="ища/х__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="мъртвец"><i>мърт</i><par n="мърт/вец__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ратай"><i>рата</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="обичай"><i>обича</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="палячо"><i>палячо</i><par n="дядо__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="деребей"><i>деребе</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="лентяй"><i>лентя</i><par n="рата/й__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="случай"><i>случа</i><par n="уле/й__n_m"/></e>
